src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON VIHTTALOGIGUHTTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Nom:htta#logi#guhtta       K                ;
             guhtta+Num+Ess:htta#logi#guhtta%>n    K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Acc:htta#logi#guhtta       K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Gen:htta#logi#guđa         K                ;
       guhtta+Num+Cmp/SgGen:htta#logi#guđa         NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc:htta#logi#guđa%>s      K                ;
 guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:htta#logi#guđa%>n      K                ; ! !SOUTH
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill:htta#logi#guhtti%>j    K                ;
     guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#guđa         K                ;
     guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#logi#guđa         K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Nom:htta#logi#guđa%>t      K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Acc:htta#logi#guđa%>X5jd   K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Gen:htta#logi#guđa%>X5jd   K                ;
     guhtta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#guđa%>X5jd   K                ;
     guhtta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:htta#logi#guđa%>X5jd   K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Ill:htta#logi#guđa%>jde    K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Com:htta#logi#guđa%>jguin  K                ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGICIEZA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          čieža+Num+Sg+Nom:#logi#čieža             K                ;
             čieža+Num+Ess:#logi#čieža%>n          K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#čieža             K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#čieža             K                ;
       čieža+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#čieža             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#čieža%>s          K                ;
 čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#čieža%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#čihčči%>j         K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#čihči%>j          K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#čiži%>j           K                ;
     čieža+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#čieža             K                ;
     čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#čieža             K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#čieža%>t          K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#čieža%>X5jd       K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#čieža%>X5jd       K                ;
     čieža+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#čieža%>X5jd       K                ;
     čieža+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#čieža%>X5jd       K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#čieža%>jde        K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#čieža%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGICIEZA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          čieža+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#čieža         K                ;
             čieža+Num+Ess:#logi#čieža%>n          K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#čieža             K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#čieža             K                ;
       čieža+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#čieža             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#čieža%>s          K                ;
 čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#čieža%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#čihčči%>j         K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#čihči%>j          K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#čiži%>j           K                ;
     čieža+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#čieža             K                ;
     čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#čieža             K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#čieža%>t          K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#čieža%>X5jd       K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#čieža%>X5jd       K                ;
     čieža+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#čieža%>X5jd       K                ;
     čieža+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#čieža%>X5jd       K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#čieža%>jde        K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#čieža%>jguin      K                ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGICIEZA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          čieža+Num+Sg+Nom:e#logi#čieža             K                ;
             čieža+Num+Ess:e#logi#čieža%>n          K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Acc:e#logi#čieža             K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:e#logi#čieža             K                ;
       čieža+Num+Cmp/SgGen:e#logi#čieža             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Loc:e#logi#čieža%>s          K                ;
 čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e#logi#čieža%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:e#logi#čihčči%>j         K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:e#logi#čihči%>j          K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:e#logi#čiži%>j           K                ;
     čieža+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#logi#čieža             K                ;
     čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#logi#čieža             K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Nom:e#logi#čieža%>t          K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Acc:e#logi#čieža%>X5jd       K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Gen:e#logi#čieža%>X5jd       K                ;
     čieža+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e#logi#čieža%>X5jd       K                ;
     čieža+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e#logi#čieža%>X5jd       K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Ill:e#logi#čieža%>jde        K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Com:e#logi#čieža%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGICIEZA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          čieža+Num+Sg+Nom:htta#logi#čieža         K                ;
             čieža+Num+Ess:htta#logi#čieža%>n      K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Acc:htta#logi#čieža         K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:htta#logi#čieža         K                ;
       čieža+Num+Cmp/SgGen:htta#logi#čieža         NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Loc:htta#logi#čieža%>s      K                ;
 čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:htta#logi#čieža%>n      K                ; ! !SOUTH
          čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:htta#logi#čihčči%>j     K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:htta#logi#čihči%>j      K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:htta#logi#čiži%>j       K                ;
     čieža+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#čieža         K                ;
     čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#logi#čieža         K                ;
          čieža+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Nom:htta#logi#čieža%>t      K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Acc:htta#logi#čieža%>X5jd   K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Gen:htta#logi#čieža%>X5jd   K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Ill:htta#logi#čieža%>jde    K                ;
     čieža+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#čieža%>X5jd   K                ;
     čieža+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:htta#logi#čieža%>X5jd   K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K                ;
          čieža+Num+Pl+Com:htta#logi#čieža%>jguin  K                ;

LEXICON 21TO99   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
   guoktelogi:guokºt         GUOKTELOGICIEZA    ;
   golbmalogi:golbma         GOLBMALOGICIEZA    ;
 njealljelogi:njeallj        GUOKTELOGICIEZA    ;
   vihttalogi:vi             VIHTTALOGIGUHTTA   ;
   vihttalogi:vi             VIHTTALOGICIEZA    ;
   guhttalogi:gu             VIHTTALOGIGUHTTA   ;
   guhttalogi:gu             VIHTTALOGICIEZA    ;
    čiežalogi:čieža          GOLBMALOGICIEZA    ;
    giežalogi:gieža          GOLBMALOGICIEZA    ;
   gávccilogi:gávcci         GAVCCILOGICIEZA    ;
    gákcilogi:gákci          GAVCCILOGICIEZA    ;
    ovccilogi:ovcci          GAVCCILOGICIEZA    ;
